Washington statutes.
RCW 1.80.160

Creation and retention of electronic records and conversion of written records by governmental agencies.

Each governmental agency of this state shall determine whether, and the extent to which, a governmental agency will create and retain electronic records and convert written records to electronic records.

[ 2020 c 57 s 17.]